dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- tornavit; tornavit; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tornavit__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tornavit; tornavit; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tornavit__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ażotu; ażotu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ażotu__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ażotu; ażotu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ażotu__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħalib; ħalib; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħalib__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħalib; ħalib; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħalib__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Sqalli; Sqalli; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Sqalli__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Sqalli; Sqalli; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Sqalli__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- uġigħ_fl-istonku; uġigħ_fl-istonku; 1 -->
    <pardef n="uġigħ_fl-istonku__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oranġjo; oranġjo; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oranġjo__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oranġjo; oranġjo; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oranġjo__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karità; karità; 1 -->
    <pardef n="karità__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ajkla; ajkla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ajkla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ajkla; ajkla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ajkla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- potassjum; potassjum; 1 -->
    <pardef n="potassjum__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- potassjum; potassjum; 1 -->
    <pardef n="potassjum__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fehma; fehma; 1 -->
    <pardef n="fehma__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zaqq; zaqq; 1 -->
    <pardef n="zaqq__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- verżjoni; verżjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="verżjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- cirasa; cirasa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="cirasa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- cirasa; cirasa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="cirasa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tagħbija; tagħbija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tagħbija__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nuċċali_tax-xemx; nuċċali_tax-xemx; 1 -->
    <pardef n="nuċċali_tax-xemx__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dundjan; dundjan; 1 -->
    <pardef n="dundjan__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żoċċ; żoċċ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żoċċ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċifra; ċifra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċifra__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċifra; ċifra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċifra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Portugiża; Portugiża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Portugiża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Portugiża; Portugiża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Portugiża__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- spiżjar; spiżjar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="spiżjar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Grieg; Grieg; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Grieg__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Grieg; Grieg; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Grieg__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bżonn; bżonn; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bżonn__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- papra; papra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="papra__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sġajra; sġajra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sġajra__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sġajra; sġajra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sġajra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħassa; ħassa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħassa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħassa; ħassa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħassa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zrinġ; zrinġ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="zrinġ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għarusa; għarusa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għarusa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żaqq; żaqq; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żaqq__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- musmar; musmar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="musmar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tornavit"><i>tornavit</i><par n="tornavit__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tornavit"><i>tornavit</i><par n="tornavit__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ażotu"><i>ażotu</i><par n="ażotu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ażotu"><i>ażotu</i><par n="ażotu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalib"><i>ħalib</i><par n="ħalib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalib"><i>ħalib</i><par n="ħalib__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Sqalli"><i>Sqalli</i><par n="Sqalli__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Sqalli"><i>Sqalli</i><par n="Sqalli__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uġigħ_fl-istonku"><i>uġigħ_fl-istonku</i><par n="uġigħ_fl-istonku__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oranġjo"><i>oranġjo</i><par n="oranġjo__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="oranġjo"><i>oranġjo</i><par n="oranġjo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="karità"><i>karità</i><par n="karità__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ajkla"><i>ajkla</i><par n="ajkla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ajkla"><i>ajkla</i><par n="ajkla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="potassjum"><i>potassjum</i><par n="potassjum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="potassjum"><i>potassjum</i><par n="potassjum__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fehma"><i>fehma</i><par n="fehma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zaqq"><i>zaqq</i><par n="zaqq__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="verżjoni"><i>verżjoni</i><par n="verżjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cirasa"><i>cirasa</i><par n="cirasa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cirasa"><i>cirasa</i><par n="cirasa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħbija"><i>tagħbija</i><par n="tagħbija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nuċċali_tax-xemx"><i>nuċċali_tax-xemx</i><par n="nuċċali_tax-xemx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dundjan"><i>dundjan</i><par n="dundjan__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żoċċ"><i>żoċċ</i><par n="żoċċ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċifra"><i>ċifra</i><par n="ċifra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċifra"><i>ċifra</i><par n="ċifra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Portugiża"><i>Portugiża</i><par n="Portugiża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Portugiża"><i>Portugiża</i><par n="Portugiża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spiżjar"><i>spiżjar</i><par n="spiżjar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Grieg"><i>Grieg</i><par n="Grieg__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Grieg"><i>Grieg</i><par n="Grieg__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bżonn"><i>bżonn</i><par n="bżonn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="papra"><i>papra</i><par n="papra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sġajra"><i>sġajra</i><par n="sġajra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sġajra"><i>sġajra</i><par n="sġajra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħassa"><i>ħassa</i><par n="ħassa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħassa"><i>ħassa</i><par n="ħassa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zrinġ"><i>zrinġ</i><par n="zrinġ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għarusa"><i>għarusa</i><par n="għarusa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żaqq"><i>żaqq</i><par n="żaqq__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="musmar"><i>musmar</i><par n="musmar__n_GD"/></e>
